Arkansas, session 2025, HB1597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-42-106(b), concerning oaths required for
elected or appointed municipal officers, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the
officers shall take their oaths before:
(A) The Secretary of State or his or her official
designee;
(B) A justice or judge; of the:
(i) Supreme Court;
(ii) Court of Appeals;
(iii) Circuit court, including any former circuit or
chancery judge who served for at least four (4) years; or
(iv) District court, including any former municipal
or district judge who served for at least four (4) years;
(C) A judge of the county court;
(D) A federal justice or judge of the:
(i) United States Supreme Court;
(ii) United States Court of Appeals; or
(iii) United States District Court;
*CEB185*
03-13-2025 14:01:52 CEB185

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 HB1597
(E) A clerk of the:
(i) County court;
(ii) Circuit court; or
(iii) City of the first class;
(E)(F) A recorder of:
(i) A city of the second class; or
(ii) An incorporated town; or
(F)(G) A justice of the peace.
(2) The council members also may take their oaths before the
mayor of the municipality.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-2-105(a), concerning who may administer
an oath of office, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Governor shall take the oath of office before:
(A) A justice or judge of the:
(i) Supreme Court;
(ii) Court of Appeals;
(iii) Circuit court; or
(iv) District court;
(B) A federal justice or judge of the:
(i) United States Supreme Court;
(ii) United States Court of Appeals; or
(iii) United States District Court;
(C) The county clerk; or
(C)(D) The clerk of the circuit court.
(2) The justices of the Supreme Court, judges of the Court of
Appeals, judges of the circuit courts, judges of the district court,
Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, and Auditor of State shall take their
oaths before:
(A) The Governor;
(B) A justice or judge of the:
(i) Supreme Court;
(ii) Court of Appeals;
(iii) Circuit court, including any former circuit or
chancery judge who served for at least four (4) years; or
(iv) District court, including any former municipal
03-13-2025 14:01:52 CEB185

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 HB1597
or district judge who served for at least four (4) years;
(C) A federal justice or judge of the:
(i) United States Supreme Court;
(ii) United States Court of Appeals; or
(iii) United States District Court;
(D) The clerk of the county court; or
(D)(E) The clerk of the circuit court.
(3) All other officers, both civil and military, shall take
their oaths before:
(A) The Secretary of State or his or her official
designee;
(B) A justice or judge of the:
(i) Supreme Court;
(ii) Court of Appeals;
(iii) Circuit court, including any former circuit or
chancery judge who served for at least four (4) years;
(iv) District court, including any former municipal
or district judge who served for at least four (4) years; or
(v) County court;
(C) A federal justice or judge of the:
(i) United States Supreme Court;
(ii) United States Court of Appeals; or
(iii) United States District Court;
(D) The clerk of the county court;
(D)(E) The clerk of the circuit court;
(E)(F) A justice of the peace;
(F)(G) A clerk of a city of the first class; or
(G)(H) A recorder of a city of the second class or
incorporated town.

/s/Dalby





03-13-2025 14:01:52 CEB185